District of Columbia statutes.
38-1809.01

Policy.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor is authorized to develop and implement a policy encouraging all residents of the District of Columbia with children attending a District of Columbia public school to attend and participate in at least one parent-teacher conference every 90 days during the academic year.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [276], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2901

Cross References

Criminal Justice Advisory Board, see § 3-901 et seq.
Smoke detectors, see § 6-751.01 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.91.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 38-1851, see § 3322 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).